Massachusetts, session 194th, H2259.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 328 of the acts of 1926, as most recently amended by chapter 26 of the acts of
2000, is hereby further amended by inserting after section 2 the following section:-
Section 2A. The district may raise, appropriate and transfer funds to The Historical
Society of Santuit and Cotuit, Inc. in the city known as the town of Barnstable to provide for its
operational needs and programming and preservation services.
of 1